Illinois, session 104th, HB5307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Notice By Publication Act is amended by 5adding Section 4.1 as follows: 6    (715 ILCS 5/4.1 new)7    Sec. 4.1. When any notice is required by law, court order, 8or by any contract, to be published in a newspaper, it is 9considered to be in compliance with the publication 10requirements if published in an online news media or digital 11news media platform as long as the media or platform serves the 12locale in which the notice is required to be published. For 13purposes of this Section, "online news media" or "digital news 14platform" means any website or digital platform that is 15regularly updated with content at least 5 days per week, has 16maintained this frequency of publication for no less than one 17year, and serves the geographic area relevant to the notice.18    This Section applies to all notices required to be 19published on or after the effective date of the amendatory Act 20of the 104th General Assembly.